Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 5

Commission on Interstate Cooperation

10-5-101 — 10-5-105. [Repealed.]

10-6-101 — 10-6-115. [Repealed.]

1. Acts 1977, No. 100.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Education:

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor:

the Cooperative Area Manpower Planning System, created by Executive Order 73-1;

the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, created by Section 1 of Act 31 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-701, and the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Advisory Committee, created by Section 5 of Act 31 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-704;

the Employment Security Division of the Department of Labor, created by Section 10 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1113;

the Labor Board, created by Section 5 of Act 25 of 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-323;

the Department of Labor, created by Section 2 of Act 161 of 1937, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-915;

the Office of the State Mine Inspector, created by Section 1 of Act 130 of 1917, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 52-401, and as transferred to the Department of Labor by Section 15 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-915;

the Board of Review created by Section 6 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1107;

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Insurance and Commerce:

the State Bank Department, created by Section 1 of Act 113 of 1913, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Banking Board, created by Section 1 of Act 60 of 1933, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-201;

the State Insurance Department, created by Section 16 of Act 148 of 1959, the same being Arkansas Statutes 66-2101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Securities Division of the State Bank Department, created by Section 30 of Act 254 of 1959, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-1262, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Professional Malpractice Insurance Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 638 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 34-2601;

the Arkansas Public Service Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 40 of 1945, the same being Arkansas Statutes 73-101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Utilities and Transportation of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Savings and Loan Association Board, created by Section 5 of Act 227 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-1805; and

the Burial Association Board, created by Section 2 of Act 91 of 1953, the same being Arkansas Statutes 66-1802.

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Transportation:

the Arkansas Transportation Commission, formerly known as the Arkansas Commerce Commission, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by the same Act;

the Arkansas Bikeways Commission, created by Executive Order 73-7;

the Arkansas Waterways Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 242 of 1967, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-1701;

the Arkansas Turnpike Authority, created by Section 2 of Act 312 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-2402;

the White River Navigation District Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 168 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-1601; and

the Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Arkansas, created by Section 1 of Act 151 of 1961, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-1812, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 1 of Act 496 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907.1.

the Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission, created by Section 4 of Act 388 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 75-2304.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs:

the Department of Local Services, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Local Services Advisory Council, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Office of Local and Regional Services within the Department of Local Services, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Health Planning Program of the Office of the Governor, transferred to the Department of Planning by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes (1973 Suppl.) 5-904, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 1 of Act 278 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes (1976) 5-904;

the Comprehensive State Health Planning Agency, created by Section 1 of Act 305 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2301, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904, and which was transferred to the State Health Planning and Development Agency by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607; and

the Health Planning Advisory Council, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Education:

the Early Childhood Development Program, created by Section 1 of Act 63 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-1694;

the Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 169 of 1931, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-102;

the Arkansas Fire Protection Personnel Standards and Education Commission, created by Section 3 of Act 483 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 19-2153;

the Pupil Discipline in Public Schools Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 214 of 1975;

the School Self-Insurance Advisory Committee, created by Section 4 of Act 380 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3512;

the School Self-Insurance Program, created by Section 6 of Act 380 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3514;

the Library Building Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 341 of 1969;

the Education Commission of the States, created by Section 1 of Act 22 of 1965 (Second Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4501;

the Student Loan Board, created by Section 3 of Act 884 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4018;

the Student Loan Guarantee Program, created by Section 2 of Act 27 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4013;

the State Board of Higher Education, formerly the Commission on Coordination of Higher Educational Finance, created by Section 2 of Act 287 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3349;

the Department of Education, created by Section 9 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-909; and

the Division of Community Junior Colleges within the Department of Higher Education, created by Section 6 of Act 287 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3353.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor:

the Department of Health created by Section 11 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-911;

the State Cancer Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 277 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-601, which was transferred to the Chronic Disease Division of the Department of Health by Section 11 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-911;

the Office of Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism, created by Section 3 of Act 50 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-720;

the Disability Determination for Social Security Administration, created by Section 1 of Act 14 of 1961 (Second Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-801;

the Community Based Rehabilitation Council, created by Section 3 of Act 378 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 43-2341;

the Alcohol Abuse Advisory Council, created by Section 4 of Act 50 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-721;

the Division of Rehabilitative Services of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Rehabilitative Services for the Blind, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Health Planning and Development Agency, located within the Department of Health, created by Section 1 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3601;

the Blind Advisory Committee, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Office of the Blind and Visually Impaired of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners, created by Section 3 of Act 650 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1134;

the State Board of Sanitarians, created by Section 4 of Act 281 of 1957, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1604;

the Psychology Examiners Board, created by Section 1 of Act 129 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 75-1501;

the Board of Podiatry, created by Section 2 of Act 610 of 1923, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-302;

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on City, County and Local Affairs:

the Office of Economic Opportunity, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 1 of Act 278 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Department of Aeronautics, created by Section 1 of Act 457 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 74-102, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Special Committee on County Government, created by Section 1 of Act 135 of 1975; and

the Municipal Corporation Board, created by Section 2 of Act 145 of 1893, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 19-208.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Economic and Industrial Resources and Development:

the Great River Road Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism, created by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Arkansas Science and Technology Council, created by Section 1 of Act 535 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1101;

the State Forestry Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 42 of 1953, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-701.1, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Geological Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 16 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-400, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Oil and Gas Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 105 of 1939, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Forestry of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Natural Resources of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Commerce Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 132 of 1957, the same being Arkansas Statutes 73-152, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Historical Preservation Program, created by Section 1 of Act 368 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-901, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Arkansas Commemorative Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 256 of 1947, the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-201, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 515 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1202;

the Arts and Humanities Advisory Council of the Department of Local Services, created by Section 3 of Act 359 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1003;

the State Committee on Stream Preservation, created by Section 1 of Act 437 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1201, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Natural Heritage Commission, created by Section 4 of Act 112 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1404;

the Department of Natural and Cultural Heritage, created by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Environmental Preservation Commission, created by Section 4 of Act 112 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1404, which was transferred to the Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission by Section 1 of Act 227 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1404.1;

the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee, created by Section 5 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-925;

the Office of the Arkansas State Arts and Humanities of the Department of Planning, created by Section 3 of Act 359 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1003, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Board of Registration for Foresters, created by Section 4 of Act 535 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2404; and

the War Decoration Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 172 of 1943, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1601.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Judiciary:

the Judicial Department, created by Section 1 of Act 496 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 22-142;

the Justice Building Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 375 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-602;

the Commission on Uniform State Laws, created by Section 1 of Act 159 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-401;

the Information Practices Board, created by Section 4 of Act 730 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 16-804;

the Investigator Licensing Board, created by Section 2 of Act 447 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2102;

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, created by Section 2 of Act 113 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 48-1302.1; and

the Prosecution Coordination Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 925 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 24-127.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs:

the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy, created by Section 2 of Act 160 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-612;

the Revenue Department Building Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 38 of 1961 (First Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes Title 13 Appendix 12;

the Soybean Promotion Board, created by Section 2 of Act 259 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 77-2002;

the Saint Francis Levee District, created pursuant to Section 1 of Act 75 of 1929, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-644;

the Southern Interstate Nuclear Board, created by Section 1 of Act 429 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1101;

the Information Systems Executive Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 744 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-927;

the Crime and Law Enforcement Commission, created by Executive Order 75-1;

the Office on Aging, as transferred to the Department of Social Rehabilitative Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904 (1973 Suppl.);

the Arkansas Veterans Service Office, created by Section 1 of Act 234 of 1945, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1401;

the Arkansas Veterans Child Welfare Service, created by Section 1 of Act 189 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1409;

the Air National Guard, created by Section 23 of Act 50 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-203;

the Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, created by Section 3 of Act 202 of 1925, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1003;

the Office of the Adjutant General, created by Section 10 of Act 50 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-110;

the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol, as transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the State Militia, created by Section 2 of Act 85 of 1929, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statute 11-102, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914; and

the Office of Emergency Services, created by Section 5 of Act 511 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1938.

the Arkansas Police Commission created by Section 2 of Act 231 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-420.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1983, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Education:

the Advisory Council for Vocational-Technical Education, created by Section 1 of Act 483 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2570;

the Advisory Committee of the State Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 416 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4302;

the Quapaw Vocational-Technical School; the Pines Vocational-Technical School; the Rich Mountain Vocational-Technical School; the Southwest Vocational-Technical School; the Twin Lakes Vocational-Technical School; the White River Vocational-Technical School; the Northwest Vocational-Technical School; the Gateway Vocational-Technical School; the Petit Jean Vocational-Technical School; the Ozarka Vocational-Technical School; the Ouachita Vocational-Technical School; the Oil Belt Vocational-Technical School; the Little Rock Vocational-Technical School; the Great Rivers Vocational-Technical School; the Forest Echoes Vocational-Technical School; the Arkansas Valley Vocational-Technical School; the Black River Vocational-Technical School; the Cossatot Vocational-Technical School; the Cotton Boll Vocational-Technical School; the Crowley's Ridge Vocational-Technical School; the Delta Vocational-Technical School; the Foothills Vocational-Technical School; the Rice Belt Vocational-Technical School; and the Red River Vocational-Technical School, as authorized by Section 3 of Act 328 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2559;

the Westark Community College and the Phillips County Community College, authorized by Section 5 of Act 103 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4205;

the Arkansas Illiteracy Commission, created by Section 20 of Act 169 of 1931, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-116;

the Arkansas Advisory Council on Public Elementary and Secondary Education, created by Section 1 of Act 76 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4101;

the Arkansas Council on Children and Youth, created by Section 1 of Act 367 of 1947, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-501;

the Advisory Council for Education of the Handicapped, created by Section 15 of Act 102 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2129;

the Arkansas Post-Secondary Education Planning Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 926 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3349.1; and

the Library Board, created by Section 5 of Act 244 of 1927, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 17-1005.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1983, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor:

the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Social Services of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Hospital Board, created by Section 1 of Act 433 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-201, which was transfered to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Arkansas Children's Colony Board, created by Section 2 of Act 6 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-1102, and the Arkansas Children's Colony at Conway, McRae, Arkadelphia, Jonesboro, Booneville, and Warren, created pursuant to Section 1 of Act 186 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-1117, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Arkansas Department of Mental Retardation and the Arkansas Board of Mental Retardation, created by Section 2 of Act 265 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-1002, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Rehabilitation of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Department of Public Welfare, and the Board of Public Welfare, created by Section 2 of Act 280 of 1939, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-102, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Rehabilitation Service, created by Section 5 of Act 43 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2544, and the Rehabilitation Services for the Blind, created by Section 1 of Act 180 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2566, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Arkansas Juvenile Training School Department, and the Arkansas Juvenile Training School Board, created by Section 2 of Act 20 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-302, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 2 of Act 340 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912.2; and

the State Board of Health, created by Section 1 of Act 96 of 1913, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-101, which was transferred to the Department of Health by Section 11 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-911.

the State Medical Examiner Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 321 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-611;

the Board of Massage, created by Section 6 of Act 180 of 1951, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1205;

the Radiation Control Agency, created by Section 4 of Act 8 of 1961 (2d Ex. Sess.), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1515;

the Board of Examiners in Speech Pathology and Audiology, created by Section 4 of Act 277 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1803;

the Medical Services Advisory Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 372 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 7-601;

the Mobile Home Commission, created by Section 14 of Act 510 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3014;

the Employment Security Advisory Council, created by Section 11 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1114;

the State Board of Cosmetology, created by Section 2 of Article 1 of Act 358 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-815;

the Social Work Registration Board, created by Section 2 of Act 899 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2801;

the Barber Examiners' Board, created by Section 15 of Act 313 of 1937, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-515;

the State Board of Nursing, created by Section 3 of Act 462 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-747;

the Plumber Licensing Division of the State Board of Health, created by Section 2 of Act 200 of 1951, as amended, the same being Ark. Stat. 71-1206;

the Plumbers Committee of Examiners created by Section 3 of Act 200 of 1951, as amended, the same being Ark. Stat. 71-1207;

the Arkansas Rural Medical Practice Student Loan and Scholarship Board created by Section 1 of Act 131 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2908; and

the Committee on Water Well Construction created by Section 5 of Act 641 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-2005.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1983, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Economic and Industrial Resources and Development:

the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Finance of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Energy Office, created by Executive Order 73-11;

the Division of Land Surveys of the State Land Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 458 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 10-1301, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 1 of Act 579 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 10-1313;

the Interstate Oil Compact Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 86 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-802;

the Land Survey Advisory Board, created by Section 4 of Act 458 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 10-1304;

the Department of Industrial Development, created by Section 6 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-906;

the Overseas Program of the Department of Industrial Development, created by Section 2 of Act 1015 of 1975 (1976 Extended Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-513.1;

the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 404 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-505; and

the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 14 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-118.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1983, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs:

the Board of Registration of Professional Soil Classifiers, created by Section 1 of Act 460 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2701;

the Contractors' Licensing Board, created by Section 2 of Act 150 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-702;

the Capitol Art Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 22 of 1911, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-216;

the State Board of Collection Agencies, created by Section 3 of Act 145 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2003;

the Consumer Advisory Board, created by Section 3 of Act 92 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 70-903;

the Advisory Committee for Registration of Landscape Architects, created by Section 3 of Act 353 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2902;

the Arkansas State Board of Architects, created by Section 1 of Act 270 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-301;

the Abstractors Board of Examiners, created by Section 3 of Act 109 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-111;

the Emergency Services Advisory Council, created by section 6 of Act 511 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1939;

the Real Estate Commission, created by Section 3 of Act 148 of 1929, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1303;

the Athletic Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 131 of 1927, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-2903;

the State Employees' Insurance Advisory Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 48 of 1972 (Ex. Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-3101;

the Surveying Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 363 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-901; and

the Election Commissioners' Board, created by Section 2 of Article 5 of Act 465 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 3-502.

the extent to which the State agency and the respective divisions, programs, and services thereof have served the public as intended by law;

the extent to which the State agency has complied with the laws and statutes defining its powers and duties;

the extent to which the State agency's operations have been impeded or enhanced by existing statutes, procedures, and practices of the State of Arkansas, or of other State agencies, and any other circumstances, including budgetary, resources, and personnel matters, which may have adversely affected the agency's operation;

the extent to which the State agency has complied with the Administrative Procedures Act in the promulgation of rules and regulations and the giving of notice and holding of formal hearings on all matters covered by the State Administrative Procedures Act;

the extent to which public representation is provided by law on the various boards and commissions which regulate the various occupational and professional licensing boards and other regulatory agencies, and the extent to which public input is utilized;

the extent to which State agencies have encouraged participation by the public in making its rules and decisions, as opposed to participation solely by persons it regulates; and

the extent and efficiency with which public complaints filed with a State agency have been processed by the State agency and its personnel, and by other applicable departments of State government, to determine whether the agency is satisfactorily rendering service to the public with respect to formal and informal complaints.

In the event the General Assembly shall enact laws continuing the existence of an agency which, under the provisions of this Act, would have terminated without such extension, said agency shall continue to perform the functions, powers, and duties imposed upon such agency by the laws of this State, unless said laws have been specifically amended or repealed or the powers, duties, and functions were transferred to another State agency.

2. Acts 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 12.

Section 7. The Division of Legislative Audit shall cooperate with the various Joint Interim Committees in making performance audits and/or providing summary audit information that may be requested by the several Joint Interim Committees in connection with their study and review of the various State agencies enumerated in Sections 3 through 5 of this Act. Each Joint Interim Committee requesting performance audits shall submit its request to the Legislative Auditor, and if the Legislative Auditor determines that there are more requests for performance audits than can be undertaken and completed by the available Auditing staff, he shall submit such request to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and said Committee shall instruct the Legislative Auditor with respect to the performance audits to be undertaken and the priorities thereof. Upon completion of performance audits and/or summary audit reports requested by the respective Joint Interim Committees, the Division of Legislative Audit shall present copies thereof to the appropriate Joint Interim Committee which has the State agency under review, and shall make itself available to such Committee for the purpose of reviewing the audit reports and/or information.

If the Joint Interim Committees to which State agencies are referred for review under the provisions of this Act shall specifically request in writing a report from the Governor containing his recommendations for continuation, abolition, or modification of each of the State agencies and the divisions and programs thereof, which are under consideration by the Joint Interim Committees, failure by the Governor to file such a report with the Committees shall not prohibit the Committees from proceeding with their duties under this Act.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. It is hereby found and determined that Act 100 of 1977 mandated the Division of Legislative Audit to make performance audits of the various State agencies to be reviewed by the several Joint Interim Committees under the provisions of said Act 100; that approximately one hundred twenty (120) State agencies are to be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committees during the 1977-78 biennium, and it will be impossible for the staff of the Division of Legislative Audit to make performance audits of each of these agencies; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to amend Section 7 of Act 100 of 1977 to permit the Division of Legislative Audit to make performance audits when requested by the respective Joint Interim Committees, and to furnish other audit information upon request, yet relieving the Division of Legislative Audit of the responsibility of making performance audits on all such agencies; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to accomplish such purpose and to expedite the work of the Joint Interim Committees during the current biennium. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

APPROVED: August 15, 1977.